Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 9. Professional Limited Liability Companies.
A former § 79-29-933 [Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 63, eff from and after July 1, 1995; Repealed by Laws, 2010, ch. 532, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2011] related to the applicability of former Article 9 to professional limited liability companies in existence of July 1, 1995.
See Editor’s Note under Chapter 29 heading.